North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-38 Community Health Grant Program [Repealed]

23-38-01.
Community health grant program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 250, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 29, § 14, effective July 1, 2017.

23-38-02.
Community health grant program advisory committee — Duties of state health officer. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 250, § 2; 2003, ch. 220, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 29, § 14, effective July 1, 2017.

23-38-03.
Gifts, grants, and donations — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 250, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 29, § 14, effective July 1, 2017.